Wisconsin, session 2025, AB232.
do enact as follows:AB232,11Section 1. 40.65 (2) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,3,6240.65 (2) (b) 3. The department shall determine whether or not the applicant 3is eligible for benefits under this section on the basis of the evidence in subd. 2. An 4applicant may appeal a determination under this subdivision to the division of 5hearings and appeals in the department of administration department of workforce 6development.AB232,27Section 2. 40.65 (2) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,3,10840.65 (2) (b) 4. In hearing an appeal under subd. 3., the division of hearings 9and appeals in the department of administration department of workforce 10development shall follow the procedures under ss. 102.16 to 102.26.AB232,311Section 3. 102.01 (2) (ad) of the statutes is repealed.AB232,412Section 4. 102.01 (2) (dm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,3,1513102.01 (2) (dm) “Order” means any decision, rule, regulation, direction, 14requirement, or standard of the department or the division, or any other 15determination arrived at or decision made by the department or the division.AB232,516Section 5. 102.04 (2r) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,3,2017102.04 (2r) (b) The franchisor has been found by the department or the 18division to have exercised a type or degree of control over the franchisee or the 19franchisee’s employees that is not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the 20purpose of protecting the franchisor’s trademarks and brand.AB232,621Section 6. 102.07 (8) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,4,322102.07 (8) (c) The division department may not admit in evidence any state or 1federal law, regulation, or document granting operating authority, or a license when 2determining whether an independent contractor meets the conditions specified in 3par. (b) 1. or 3.AB232,74Section 7. 102.12 of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,4,235102.12 Notice of injury, exception, laches. No claim for compensation 6may be maintained unless, within 30 days after the occurrence of the injury or 7within 30 days after the employee knew or ought to have known the nature of his or 8her disability and its relation to the employment, actual notice was received by the 9employer or by an officer, manager or designated representative of an employer. If 10no representative has been designated by posters placed in one or more conspicuous 11places where notices to employees are customarily posted, then notice received by 12any superior is sufficient. Absence of notice does not bar recovery if it is found that 13the employer was not misled by that absence. Regardless of whether notice was 14received, if no payment of compensation, other than medical treatment or burial 15expense, is made, and if no application is filed with the department within 2 years 16after the date of the injury or death or the date the employee or his or her dependent 17knew or ought to have known the nature of the disability and its relation to the 18employment, the right to compensation for the injury or death is barred, except that 19the right to compensation is not barred if the employer knew or should have known, 20within the 2-year period, that the employee had sustained the injury on which the 21claim is based. Issuance of notice of a hearing on the motion of the department or 22the division has the same effect for the purposes of this section as the filing of an 23application. This section does not affect any claim barred under s. 102.17 (4).AB232,81Section 8. 102.13 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,5,92102.13 (1) (c) So long as the employee, after a written request of the employer 3or insurer that complies with par. (b), refuses to submit to or in any way obstructs 4the examination, the employee’s right to begin or maintain any proceeding for the 5collection of compensation is suspended, except as provided in sub. (4). If the 6employee refuses to submit to the examination after direction by the department, 7the division, or an examiner, or in any way obstructs the examination, the 8employee’s right to the weekly indemnity that accrues and becomes payable during 9the period of that refusal or obstruction, is barred, except as provided in sub. (4).AB232,910Section 9. 102.13 (1) (d) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,5,1511102.13 (1) (d) 2. Any physician, chiropractor, psychologist, dentist, physician 12assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or podiatrist who attended a worker’s 13compensation claimant for any condition or complaint reasonably related to the 14condition for which the claimant claims compensation may be required to testify 15before the division department when the division department so directs.AB232,1016Section 10. 102.13 (1) (d) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,5,2317102.13 (1) (d) 3. Notwithstanding any statutory provisions except par. (e), any 18physician, chiropractor, psychologist, dentist, physician assistant, advanced 19practice registered nurse, or podiatrist attending a worker’s compensation claimant 20for any condition or complaint reasonably related to the condition for which the 21claimant claims compensation may furnish to the employee, employer, worker’s 22compensation insurer, or department, or division information and reports relative 23related to a compensation claim.AB232,1124Section 11. 102.13 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,6,31102.13 (1) (f) If an employee claims compensation under s. 102.81 (1), the 2department or the division may require the employee to submit to physical or 3vocational examinations under this subsection.AB232,124Section 12. 102.13 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,6,215102.13 (2) (a) An employee who reports an injury alleged to be work-related or 6files an application for hearing waives any physician-patient, psychologist-patient, 7or chiropractor-patient privilege with respect to any condition or complaint 8reasonably related to the condition for which the employee claims compensation. 9Notwithstanding ss. 51.30 and 146.82 and any other law, any physician, 10chiropractor, psychologist, dentist, podiatrist, physician assistant, advanced 11practice registered nurse, hospital, or health care provider shall, within a 12reasonable time after written request by the employee, employer, worker’s 13compensation insurer, or department, or division, or its representative, provide that 14person with any information or written material reasonably related to any injury 15for which the employee claims compensation. If the request is by a representative of 16a worker’s compensation insurer for a billing statement, the physician, chiropractor, 17psychologist, dentist, podiatrist, physician assistant, advanced practice registered 18nurse, hospital, or health care provider shall, within 30 days after receiving the 19request, provide that person with a complete copy of an itemized billing statement 20or a billing statement in a standard billing format recognized by the federal 21government.AB232,1322Section 13. 102.13 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,7,1123102.13 (3) If 2 or more physicians, chiropractors, psychologists, dentists, or 24podiatrists disagree as to the extent of an injured employee’s temporary disability, 1the end of an employee’s healing period, an employee’s ability to return to work at 2suitable available employment or the necessity for further treatment or for a 3particular type of treatment, the department or the division may appoint another 4physician, chiropractor, psychologist, dentist, or podiatrist to examine the employee 5and render an opinion as soon as possible. The department or the division shall 6promptly notify the parties of this appointment. If the employee has not returned to 7work, payment for temporary disability shall continue until the department or the 8division receives the opinion. The employer or its insurance carrier, or both, shall 9pay for the examination and opinion. The employer or insurance carrier, or both, 10shall receive appropriate credit for any overpayment to the employee determined by 11the department or the division after receipt of the opinion.AB232,1412Section 14. 102.13 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,8,413102.13 (4) The right of an employee to begin or maintain proceedings for the 14collection of compensation and to receive weekly indemnities that accrue and 15become payable shall not be suspended or barred under sub. (1) when an employee 16refuses to submit to a physical examination, upon the request of the employer or 17worker’s compensation insurer or at the direction of the department, the division, or 18an examiner, that would require the employee to travel a distance of 100 miles or 19more from his or her place of residence, unless the employee has claimed 20compensation for treatment from a practitioner whose office is located 100 miles or 21more from the employee’s place of residence or the department, division, or 22examiner determines that any other circumstances warrant the examination. If the 23employee has claimed compensation for treatment from a practitioner whose office 1is located 100 miles or more from the employee’s place of residence, the employer or 2insurer may request, or the department, the division, or an examiner may direct, 3the employee to submit to a physical examination in the area where the employee’s 4treatment practitioner is located.AB232,155Section 15. 102.13 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,8,146102.13 (5) The department or the division may refuse to receive testimony as 7to conditions determined from an autopsy if it appears that the party offering the 8testimony had procured the autopsy and had failed to make reasonable effort to 9notify at least one party in adverse interest or the department or the division at 10least 12 hours before the autopsy of the time and place at which the autopsy would 11be performed, or that the autopsy was performed by or at the direction of the 12coroner or medical examiner or at the direction of the district attorney for purposes 13not authorized under ch. 979. The department or the division may withhold 14findings until an autopsy is held in accordance with its directions.AB232,1615Section 16. 102.14 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,8,1716102.14 (title) Jurisdiction of department and division; advisory 17committee council.AB232,1718Section 17. 102.14 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,8,2019102.14 (1) Except as otherwise provided, this chapter shall be administered 20by the department and the division.AB232,1821Section 18. 102.14 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,9,722102.14 (2) The council on worker’s compensation shall advise the department 23and the division in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, shall submit its 1recommendations with respect to amendments to this chapter to each regular 2session of the legislature, and shall report its views upon any pending bill relating 3to this chapter to the proper legislative committee. At the request of the 4chairpersons of the senate and assembly committees on labor, the department shall 5schedule a meeting of the council with the members of the senate and assembly 6committees on labor to review and discuss matters of legislative concern arising 7under this chapter.AB232,198Section 19. 102.15 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB232,209Section 20. 102.16 (1) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB232,9,2210102.16 (1) Any controversy concerning compensation or a violation of sub. (3), 11including a controversy in which the state may be a party, shall be submitted to the 12department in the manner and with the effect provided in this chapter. A 13compromise of any claim for compensation may be reviewed and set aside, modified, 14or confirmed by the department within one year after the date on which the 15compromise is filed with the department, the date on which an award has been 16entered based on the compromise, or the date on which an application for the 17department to take any of those actions is filed with the department. Unless the 18word “compromise” appears in a stipulation of settlement, the settlement shall not 19be considered a compromise, and further claim is not barred except as provided in s. 20102.17 (4) regardless of whether an award is made. The employer, insurer, or 21dependent under s. 102.51 (5) shall have equal rights with the employee to have a 22compromise or any other stipulation of settlement reviewed under this subsection. 1Upon petition filed with the department under this subsection, the department 2may set aside the award or otherwise determine the rights of the parties.AB232,213Section 21. 102.16 (1m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,10,204102.16 (1m) (a) If an insurer or self-insured employer concedes by compromise 5under sub. (1) or stipulation under s. 102.18 (1) (a) that the insurer or self-insured 6employer is liable under this chapter for any health services provided to an injured 7employee by a health service provider, but disputes the reasonableness of the fee 8charged by the health service provider, the department or the division may include 9in its order confirming the compromise or stipulation a determination made by the 10department under sub. (2) as to the reasonableness of the fee or, if such a 11determination has not yet been made, the department or the division may notify, or 12direct the insurer or self-insured employer to notify, the health service provider 13under sub. (2) (b) that the reasonableness of the fee is in dispute. The department 14or the division shall deny payment of a health service fee that the department 15determines under sub. (2) to be unreasonable. A health service provider and an 16insurer or self-insured employer that are parties to a fee dispute under this 17paragraph are bound by the department’s determination under sub. (2) on the 18reasonableness of the disputed fee, unless that determination is set aside, reversed, 19or modified by the department under sub. (2) (f) or is set aside on judicial review as 20provided in sub. (2) (f).AB232,2221Section 22. 102.16 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,11,2222102.16 (1m) (b) If an insurer or self-insured employer concedes by compromise 23under sub. (1) or stipulation under s. 102.18 (1) (a) that the insurer or self-insured 1employer is liable under this chapter for any treatment provided to an injured 2employee by a health service provider, but disputes the necessity of the treatment, 3the department or the division may include in its order confirming the compromise 4or stipulation a determination made by the department under sub. (2m) as to the 5necessity of the treatment or, if such a determination has not yet been made, the 6department or the division may notify, or direct the insurer or self-insured employer 7to notify, the health service provider under sub. (2m) (b) that the necessity of the 8treatment is in dispute. Before determining under sub. (2m) the necessity of 9treatment provided to an injured employee, the department may, but is not required 10to, obtain the opinion of an expert selected by the department who is qualified as 11provided in sub. (2m) (c). The standards promulgated under sub. (2m) (g) shall be 12applied by an expert and by the department in rendering an opinion as to, and in 13determining, necessity of treatment under this paragraph. In cases in which no 14standards promulgated under sub. (2m) (g) apply, the department shall find the 15facts regarding necessity of treatment. The department or the division shall deny 16payment for any treatment that the department determines under sub. (2m) to be 17unnecessary. A health service provider and an insurer or self-insured employer 18that are parties to a dispute under this paragraph over the necessity of treatment 19are bound by the department’s determination under sub. (2m) on the necessity of 20the disputed treatment, unless that determination is set aside, reversed, or 21modified by the department under sub. (2m) (e) or is set aside on judicial review as 22provided in sub. (2m) (e).AB232,2323Section 23. 102.16 (1m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB232,12,201102.16 (1m) (c) If an insurer or self-insured employer concedes by compromise 2under sub. (1) or stipulation under s. 102.18 (1) (a) that the insurer or self-insured 3employer is liable under this chapter for the cost of a prescription drug dispensed 4under s. 102.425 (2) for outpatient use by an injured employee, but disputes the 5reasonableness of the amount charged for the prescription drug, the department or 6the division may include in its order confirming the compromise or stipulation a 7determination made by the department under s. 102.425 (4m) as to the 8reasonableness of the prescription drug charge or, if such a determination has not 9yet been made, the department or the division may notify, or direct the insurer or 10self-insured employer to notify, the pharmacist or practitioner dispensing the 11prescription drug under s. 102.425 (4m) (b) that the reasonableness of the 12prescription drug charge is in dispute. The department or the division shall deny 13payment of a prescription drug charge that the department determines under s. 14102.425 (4m) to be unreasonable. A pharmacist or practitioner and an insurer or 15self-insured employer that are parties to a dispute under this paragraph over the 16reasonableness of a prescription drug charge are bound by the department’s 17determination under s. 102.425 (4m) on the reasonableness of the disputed 18prescription drug charge, unless that determination is set aside, reversed, or 19modified by the department under s. 102.425 (4m) (e) or is set aside on judicial 20review as provided in s. 102.425 (4m) (e).AB232,2421Section 24. 102.16 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab232 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab232 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB232 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB232 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB232: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting